Utah statutes.
49-21-405.   Disability benefit -- Exclusions.

A monthly disability benefit is not payable for the following:

(1)  self-inflicted injury;

(2)  alcoholism;

(3)  substance abuse;

(4)  disability arising from or caused by acts of aggression committed by the eligible employee; or

(5)  the eligible employee committing or attempting to commit a felony or other illegal act.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 250, 2002 General Session

